Utah statutes.
77-30-11.   Penalty for disobedience of habeas corpus.
Any officer who shall deliver to the agent for extradition of the demanding
state a person in his custody under the governor's warrant, in willful
disobedience to Section 77-30-10, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction shall be fined not more than $1,000 or be imprisoned in the county
jail not more than six months, or both.
